Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-288
Final decision; judicial review; appeal to district court; other relief.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision in a contested case under the Student Discipline Act, whether such decision is affirmative or negative in form, shall be entitled to judicial review under sections 79-288 to 79-292. Nothing in the act shall be deemed to prevent resort to other means of review, redress, or relief provided by law.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 32;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 38;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,201;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 92.